Hawaii statutes.
§121-23 Oath required. Every person
appointed or commissioned as an officer or who enlists or reenlists shall sign
and take an oath of allegiance to the State and the United States, in a form as
may be prescribed by the regulations issued by the commander in chief. A
person making a false oath as to any statement contained in any enlistment
paper or oath shall be guilty of perjury and upon conviction thereof shall be
sentenced as provided by law. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-23]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next